Tennessee, session 114, HB0750.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 49-6-809(h), is amended by deleting
the subsection and substituting:
(h) Following the conclusion of each school year, the chief law enforcement
officer of each law enforcement agency with law enforcement jurisdiction for a school
that has utilized armed school security officers pursuant to this section shall submit a
report to the governor, the chair of the committee of the house of representatives with
subject matter jurisdiction over education, the chair of the education committee of the
senate, and the commissioner of education on or before September 1 of each year, that
details any school security deficiencies and that provides recommendations for security
improvements for each such school. If the report requirement of this subsection (h)
affects more than one (1) law enforcement agency within any one (1) county, then the
affected chief law enforcement officers shall submit a single, consolidated report
covering the schools that have utilized armed school security officers pursuant to this
section.
SECTION 2. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
HB0750
002640
- 1 -